public_html/app/tools/lang/data/vec2.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX A ar iéde/P [abcefgijklmnpsvxđŧ]onar
SFX A ar iéde/P [abdefklmopsvx]itar
SFX A ar iéde/P [abdfgijklmnpstxñđ]orar
SFX A ar iéde/P [abdfgikmst]urar
SFX A ar iéde/P [abdfijkmnprstuŧ]elar
SFX A ar iéde/P [abdgiotu]riđar
SFX A ar iéde/P [abfgptu]regar
SFX A ar iéde/P [abfjlnpr]utar
SFX A ar iéde/P [abfkx]renar
SFX A ar iéde/P [abfot]raŧar
SFX A ar iéde/P [abik]rokar
SFX A ar iéde/P [adiopt]ronar
SFX A ar iéde/P [adklpstuvđŧ]enar
SFX A ar iéde/P [aeilnsu]kar
SFX A ar iéde/P [aeinosu]tegar
SFX A ar iéde/P [aeio]strar
SFX A ar iéde/P [aeiop]letar
SFX A ar iéde/P [aeiou]xenar
SFX A ar iéde/P [aeiru]ñar
SFX A ar iéde/P [aeiu]ngar
SFX A ar iéde/P [aelo]var
SFX A ar iéde/P [aenoux]golar
SFX A ar iéde/P [aeors]tiđar
SFX A ar iéde/P [aeou]mentar
SFX A ar iéde/P [agot]rejar
SFX A ar iéde/P [ai]erar
SFX A ar iéde/P [ai]ñaŧar
SFX A ar iéde/P [ail]gar
SFX A ar iéde/P [ailnou]sar
SFX A ar iéde/P [ailnu]bar
SFX A ar iéde/P [ailu]minar
SFX A ar iéde/P [aiou]rmar
SFX A ar iéde/P [aku]rifegar
SFX A ar iéde/P [als]tar
SFX A ar iéde/P [an]deđar
SFX A ar iéde/P [an]fraxar
SFX A ar iéde/P [an]kuerar
SFX A ar iéde/P [an]kuirar
SFX A ar iéde/P [ano]fegar
SFX A ar iéde/P [ao]niđar
SFX A ar iéde/P [ao]rcar
SFX A ar iéde/P [ao]rdar
SFX A ar iéde/P [ao]rdonar
SFX A ar iéde/P [ao]rkar
SFX A ar iéde/P [ao]rnar
SFX A ar iéde/P [ao]rsar
SFX A ar iéde/P [aou]rbar
SFX A ar iéde/P [aou]rgar
SFX A ar iéde/P [aou]rlar
SFX A ar iéde/P [aou]rtar
SFX A ar iéde/P [aou]rŧar
SFX A ar iéde/P [ar]naliđar
SFX A ar iéde/P [aux]nar
SFX A ar iéde/P [bcdefgijmnpsvxđŧ]otar
SFX A ar iéde/P [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A ar iéde/P [bcfgiklnoprtŧ]eđar
SFX A ar iéde/P [bcfgjklmnoptuv]aŧar
SFX A ar iéde/P [bcfilrtđ]ugar
SFX A ar iéde/P [bcmpruŧ]efar
SFX A ar iéde/P [bdegikmprstđ]aliđar
SFX A ar iéde/P [bdflmvđ]ogar
SFX A ar iéde/P [bdgklmnptuv]ajar
SFX A ar iéde/P [bdgkpv]rar
SFX A ar iéde/P [bdilmnopsvxñđŧ]egar
SFX A ar iéde/P [bdklmoprtuv]acar
SFX A ar iéde/P [bfilmtuv]antar
SFX A ar iéde/P [bgknpstv]axar
SFX A ar iéde/P [bjklmrt]oŧar
SFX A ar iéde/P [blmpstvx]irar
SFX A ar iéde/P [blprsvx]ear
SFX A ar iéde/P [bmnpxŧ]igolar
SFX A ar iéde/P [bou]rogar
SFX A ar iéde/P [bp]erlar
SFX A ar iéde/P [btv]ergar
SFX A ar iéde/P [bxŧ]eregar
SFX A ar iéde/P [cfglopsv]esar
SFX A ar iéde/P [clmnrsv]odar
SFX A ar iéde/P [dfgklmnopst]ejar
SFX A ar iéde/P [dg]obar
SFX A ar iéde/P [dgkmnprs]uar
SFX A ar iéde/P [dijlorstuvxđ]entar
SFX A ar iéde/P [dlnstxñŧ]ifegar
SFX A ar iéde/P [dltv]ernar
SFX A ar iéde/P [eilnu]ŧar
SFX A ar iéde/P [eilox]mar
SFX A ar iéde/P [einoru]xar
SFX A ar iéde/P [einosu]car
SFX A ar iéde/P [eiu]xurar
SFX A ar iéde/P [eo]liđar
SFX A ar iéde/P [eo]ntiđar
SFX A ar iéde/P [es]kotar
SFX A ar iéde/P [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ar iéde/P [fjkx]ermar
SFX A ar iéde/P [fklrsx]oñar
SFX A ar iéde/P [fm]eretar
SFX A ar iéde/P [fpvŧ]iolar
SFX A ar iéde/P [fŧ]etuar
SFX A ar iéde/P [gin]ritar
SFX A ar iéde/P [iln]trar
SFX A ar iéde/P [inru]jar
SFX A ar iéde/P [io]ntar
SFX A ar iéde/P [io]rkolar
SFX A ar iéde/P [ipt]ađar
SFX A ar iéde/P [ipu]lar
SFX A ar iéde/P [irst]umar
SFX A ar iéde/P [klt]ivar
SFX A ar iéde/P [kp]avejar
SFX A ar iéde/P [kt]erŧar
SFX A ar iéde/P [ln]etrar
SFX A ar iéde/P [lnoru]đar
SFX A ar iéde/P [mp]eritar
SFX A ar iéde/P [mv]ergolar
SFX A ar iéde/P [ns]erbar
SFX A ar iéde/P [ns]ervar
SFX A ar iéde/P [ns]kuercar
SFX A ar iéde/P [nsv]edar
SFX A ar iéde/P [nx]goŧar
SFX A ar iéde/P [op]ar
SFX A ar iéde/P [ox]longar
SFX A ar iéde/P [pt]resar
SFX A ar iéde/P [pt]rotar
SFX A ar iéde/P [stŧ]imentar
SFX A ar iéde/P [sŧ]erkar
SFX A ar iéde/P [tuv]iliđar
SFX A ar iéde/P [tv]eriđar
SFX A ar iéde/P [tv]erniđar
SFX A ar iéde/P [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ar iéde/P alar
SFX A ar iéde/P alienar
SFX A ar iéde/P amar
SFX A ar iéde/P arar
SFX A ar iéde/P bersajar
SFX A ar iéde/P bertonar
SFX A ar iéde/P bordeđar
SFX A ar iéde/P dar
SFX A ar iéde/P deramar
SFX A ar iéde/P derenar
SFX A ar iéde/P derivar
SFX A ar iéde/P derobar
SFX A ar iéde/P derokar
SFX A ar iéde/P derotar
SFX A ar iéde/P devorar
SFX A ar iéde/P dexeredar
SFX A ar iéde/P dexverxenar
SFX A ar iéde/P donar
SFX A ar iéde/P exerŧitar
SFX A ar iéde/P far
SFX A ar iéde/P fermentar
SFX A ar iéde/P fumar
SFX A ar iéde/P guernar
SFX A ar iéde/P inbaretar
SFX A ar iéde/P infervorar
SFX A ar iéde/P inkartonar
SFX A ar iéde/P interesar
SFX A ar iéde/P interkalar
SFX A ar iéde/P interkuerar
SFX A ar iéde/P interkuirar
SFX A ar iéde/P interlinear
SFX A ar iéde/P intermeđar
SFX A ar iéde/P interogar
SFX A ar iéde/P interpretar
SFX A ar iéde/P inŧercelar
SFX A ar iéde/P kalar
SFX A ar iéde/P kalefar
SFX A ar iéde/P kantar
SFX A ar iéde/P kolar
SFX A ar iéde/P korniđar
SFX A ar iéde/P kriolar
SFX A ar iéde/P kurvar
SFX A ar iéde/P lotar
SFX A ar iéde/P lumar
SFX A ar iéde/P lustrar
SFX A ar iéde/P maravejar
SFX A ar iéde/P menar
SFX A ar iéde/P meravejar
SFX A ar iéde/P merkantar
SFX A ar iéde/P merkantiđar
SFX A ar iéde/P međar
SFX A ar iéde/P mojar
SFX A ar iéde/P mudarar
SFX A ar iéde/P ojar
SFX A ar iéde/P okar
SFX A ar iéde/P ormeđar
SFX A ar iéde/P perdonar
SFX A ar iéde/P perfumar
SFX A ar iéde/P perifraxar
SFX A ar iéde/P periodar
SFX A ar iéde/P perkolar
SFX A ar iéde/P perkotar
SFX A ar iéde/P perletar
SFX A ar iéde/P perlustrar
SFX A ar iéde/P permudarar
SFX A ar iéde/P permutar
SFX A ar iéde/P perorar
SFX A ar iéde/P perpetrar
SFX A ar iéde/P perpetuar
SFX A ar iéde/P perseguitar
SFX A ar iéde/P personaliđar
SFX A ar iéde/P persugar
SFX A ar iéde/P pertegar
SFX A ar iéde/P pongar
SFX A ar iéde/P rajar
SFX A ar iéde/P ramar
SFX A ar iéde/P raxar
SFX A ar iéde/P redar
SFX A ar iéde/P rigolar
SFX A ar iéde/P rivar
SFX A ar iéde/P robar
SFX A ar iéde/P roersar
SFX A ar iéde/P rolar
SFX A ar iéde/P sajar
SFX A ar iéde/P scantiđar
SFX A ar iéde/P seguitar
SFX A ar iéde/P serajar
SFX A ar iéde/P skortegar
SFX A ar iéde/P sotolinear
SFX A ar iéde/P spergoŧar
SFX A ar iéde/P sperimentar
SFX A ar iéde/P sperlongar
SFX A ar iéde/P spernacar
SFX A ar iéde/P speronar
SFX A ar iéde/P sperđurar
SFX A ar iéde/P steriliđar
SFX A ar iéde/P sugar
SFX A ar iéde/P terapienar
SFX A ar iéde/P teraŧar
SFX A ar iéde/P termenar
SFX A ar iéde/P terminar
SFX A ar iéde/P terŧariolar
SFX A ar iéde/P tonar
SFX A ar iéde/P tormentar
SFX A ar iéde/P tuar
SFX A ar iéde/P vejar
SFX A ar iéde/P velar
SFX A ar iéde/P verdeđar
SFX A ar iéde/P vergiđar
SFX A ar iéde/P vergoñar
SFX A ar iéde/P verifegar
SFX A ar iéde/P verigolar
SFX A ar iéde/P verolar
SFX A ar iéde/P versar
SFX A ar iéde/P verxurar
SFX A ar iéde/P verđelar
SFX A ar iéde/P xberlefar
SFX A ar iéde/P xberlotar
SFX A ar iéde/P xberlumar
SFX A ar iéde/P xberxelar
SFX A ar iéde/P xelar
SFX A ar iéde/P xermojar
SFX A ar iéde/P xgoñar
SFX A ar iéde/P xlargiđar
SFX A ar iéde/P xmerdar
SFX A ar iéde/P xmerejar
SFX A ar iéde/P xmorgolar
SFX A ar iéde/P xnervađar
SFX A ar iéde/P xvergoñaŧar
SFX A ar iéde/P đurar
SFX A ar iéde/P ŧercar
SFX A ar iéde/P ŧitar
SFX A ar iége/P [abcdefmnpstvxñđŧ]olar
SFX A ar iége/P [abcdfgijknopstvxŧ]etar
SFX A ar iége/P [abcdfjkmpsv]iđar
SFX A ar iége/P [abcdfklnoprstuvxđŧ]inar
SFX A ar iége/P [abcefgijklmnpsvxđŧ]onar
SFX A ar iége/P [abdefklmopsvx]itar
SFX A ar iége/P [abdfgijklmnpstxñđ]orar
SFX A ar iége/P [abdfgikmst]urar
SFX A ar iége/P [abdfijkmnprstuŧ]elar
SFX A ar iége/P [abdgiotu]riđar
SFX A ar iége/P [abfgptu]regar
SFX A ar iége/P [abfjlnpr]utar
SFX A ar iége/P [abfkx]renar
SFX A ar iége/P [abfot]raŧar
SFX A ar iége/P [abik]rokar
SFX A ar iége/P [adiopt]ronar
SFX A ar iége/P [adklpstuvđŧ]enar
SFX A ar iége/P [aeilnsu]kar
SFX A ar iége/P [aeinosu]tegar
SFX A ar iége/P [aeio]strar
SFX A ar iége/P [aeiop]letar
SFX A ar iége/P [aeiou]xenar
SFX A ar iége/P [aeiru]ñar
SFX A ar iége/P [aeiu]ngar
SFX A ar iége/P [aelo]var
SFX A ar iége/P [aenoux]golar
SFX A ar iége/P [aeors]tiđar
SFX A ar iége/P [aeou]mentar
SFX A ar iége/P [agot]rejar
SFX A ar iége/P [ai]erar
SFX A ar iége/P [ai]ñaŧar
SFX A ar iége/P [ail]gar
SFX A ar iége/P [ailnou]sar
SFX A ar iége/P [ailnu]bar
SFX A ar iége/P [ailu]minar
SFX A ar iége/P [aiou]rmar
SFX A ar iége/P [aku]rifegar
SFX A ar iége/P [als]tar
SFX A ar iége/P [an]deđar
SFX A ar iége/P [an]fraxar
SFX A ar iége/P [an]kuerar
SFX A ar iége/P [an]kuirar
SFX A ar iége/P [ano]fegar
SFX A ar iége/P [ao]niđar
SFX A ar iége/P [ao]rcar
SFX A ar iége/P [ao]rdar
SFX A ar iége/P [ao]rdonar
SFX A ar iége/P [ao]rkar
SFX A ar iége/P [ao]rnar
SFX A ar iége/P [ao]rsar
SFX A ar iége/P [aou]rbar
SFX A ar iége/P [aou]rgar
SFX A ar iége/P [aou]rlar
SFX A ar iége/P [aou]rtar
SFX A ar iége/P [aou]rŧar
SFX A ar iége/P [ar]naliđar
SFX A ar iége/P [aux]nar
SFX A ar iége/P [bcdefgijmnpsvxđŧ]otar
SFX A ar iége/P [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A ar iége/P [bcfgiklnoprtŧ]eđar
SFX A ar iége/P [bcfgjklmnoptuv]aŧar
SFX A ar iége/P [bcfilrtđ]ugar
SFX A ar iége/P [bcmpruŧ]efar
SFX A ar iége/P [bdegikmprstđ]aliđar
SFX A ar iége/P [bdflmvđ]ogar
SFX A ar iége/P [bdgklmnptuv]ajar
SFX A ar iége/P [bdgkpv]rar
SFX A ar iége/P [bdilmnopsvxñđŧ]egar
SFX A ar iége/P [bdklmoprtuv]acar
SFX A ar iége/P [bfilmtuv]antar
SFX A ar iége/P [bgknpstv]axar
SFX A ar iége/P [bjklmrt]oŧar
SFX A ar iége/P [blmpstvx]irar
SFX A ar iége/P [blprsvx]ear
SFX A ar iége/P [bmnpxŧ]igolar
SFX A ar iége/P [bou]rogar
SFX A ar iége/P [bp]erlar
SFX A ar iége/P [btv]ergar
SFX A ar iége/P [bxŧ]eregar
SFX A ar iége/P [cfglopsv]esar
SFX A ar iége/P [clmnrsv]odar
SFX A ar iége/P [dfgklmnopst]ejar
SFX A ar iége/P [dg]obar
SFX A ar iége/P [dgkmnprs]uar
SFX A ar iége/P [dijlorstuvxđ]entar
SFX A ar iége/P [dlnstxñŧ]ifegar
SFX A ar iége/P [dltv]ernar
SFX A ar iége/P [eilnu]ŧar
SFX A ar iége/P [eilox]mar
SFX A ar iége/P [einoru]xar
SFX A ar iége/P [einosu]car
SFX A ar iége/P [eiu]xurar
SFX A ar iége/P [eo]liđar
SFX A ar iége/P [eo]ntiđar
SFX A ar iége/P [es]kotar
SFX A ar iége/P [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ar iége/P [fjkx]ermar
SFX A ar iége/P [fklrsx]oñar
SFX A ar iége/P [fm]eretar
SFX A ar iége/P [fpvŧ]iolar
SFX A ar iége/P [fŧ]etuar
SFX A ar iége/P [gin]ritar
SFX A ar iége/P [iln]trar
SFX A ar iége/P [inru]jar
SFX A ar iége/P [io]ntar
SFX A ar iége/P [io]rkolar
SFX A ar iége/P [ipt]ađar
SFX A ar iége/P [ipu]lar
SFX A ar iége/P [irst]umar
SFX A ar iége/P [klt]ivar
SFX A ar iége/P [kp]avejar
SFX A ar iége/P [kt]erŧar
SFX A ar iége/P [ln]etrar
SFX A ar iége/P [lnoru]đar
SFX A ar iége/P [mp]eritar
SFX A ar iége/P [mv]ergolar
SFX A ar iége/P [ns]erbar
SFX A ar iége/P [ns]ervar
SFX A ar iége/P [ns]kuercar
SFX A ar iége/P [nsv]edar
SFX A ar iége/P [nx]goŧar
SFX A ar iége/P [op]ar
SFX A ar iége/P [ox]longar
SFX A ar iége/P [pt]resar
SFX A ar iége/P [pt]rotar
SFX A ar iége/P [stŧ]imentar
SFX A ar iége/P [sŧ]erkar
SFX A ar iége/P [tuv]iliđar
SFX A ar iége/P [tv]eriđar
SFX A ar iége/P [tv]erniđar
SFX A ar iége/P [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ar iége/P alar
SFX A ar iége/P alienar
SFX A ar iége/P amar
SFX A ar iége/P arar
SFX A ar iége/P bersajar
SFX A ar iége/P bertonar
SFX A ar iége/P bordeđar
SFX A ar iége/P dar
SFX A ar iége/P deramar
SFX A ar iége/P derenar
SFX A ar iége/P derivar
SFX A ar iége/P derobar
SFX A ar iége/P derokar
SFX A ar iége/P derotar
SFX A ar iége/P devorar
SFX A ar iége/P dexeredar
SFX A ar iége/P dexverxenar
SFX A ar iége/P donar
SFX A ar iége/P exerŧitar
SFX A ar iége/P far
SFX A ar iége/P fermentar
SFX A ar iége/P fumar
SFX A ar iége/P guernar
SFX A ar iége/P inbaretar
SFX A ar iége/P infervorar
SFX A ar iége/P inkartonar
SFX A ar iége/P interesar
SFX A ar iége/P interkalar
SFX A ar iége/P interkuerar
SFX A ar iége/P interkuirar
SFX A ar iége/P interlinear
SFX A ar iége/P intermeđar
SFX A ar iége/P interogar
SFX A ar iége/P interpretar
SFX A ar iége/P inŧercelar
SFX A ar iége/P kalar
SFX A ar iége/P kalefar
SFX A ar iége/P kantar
SFX A ar iége/P kolar
SFX A ar iége/P korniđar
SFX A ar iége/P kriolar
SFX A ar iége/P kurvar
SFX A ar iége/P lotar
SFX A ar iége/P lumar
SFX A ar iége/P lustrar
SFX A ar iége/P maravejar
SFX A ar iége/P menar
SFX A ar iége/P meravejar
SFX A ar iége/P merkantar
SFX A ar iége/P merkantiđar
SFX A ar iége/P međar
SFX A ar iége/P mojar
SFX A ar iége/P mudarar
SFX A ar iége/P ojar
